Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-365.05
Sewerage systems and sewage disposal plants; franchises; power to grant; service; payment.

For the purpose of providing for such sewage disposal plant and sewerage system, including any storm sewer system, or improving or extending such existing system, any such municipality may also enter into a contract with any corporation organized under or authorized by the laws of this state to engage in the business herein mentioned, to receive and treat, in the manner hereinbefore mentioned, the sewage and night soil thereof, and to construct and provide the facilities and services as hereinbefore described. Such contract may also authorize the corporation to charge the owners of the premises served such a service rate therefor as the governing body of such municipality may determine to be just and reasonable. The municipality may contract to pay the said corporation a flat rate for such service, and pay therefor out of its general fund or the proceeds of any tax levy applicable to the purposes of such contract, or assess the owners of the property served a reasonable charge therefor to be collected, as provided in section 14-365.03, and paid into a fund to be used to defray such contract charges.

Laws 1953, c. 24, § 5, p. 100.

A lease-purchase agreement relating to financing of a waste disposal plant and authorized by this section is not a franchise that violates section 14-811. Cosentino v. City of Omaha, 186 Neb. 407, 183 N.W.2d 475 (1971).